North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-11 County Superintendent of Schools

15.1-11-01.
County superintendent of schools — Employment — Qualifications.

Except as provided in section 15.1-11-02, each board of county commissioners shall employ a county superintendent of schools on a full-time or a part-time basis. An individual hired under this section:

Must hold a baccalaureate degree from a regional or nationally accredited institution of higher education approved for teacher education.

Must hold a valid North Dakota professional teaching license.

Must have experience teaching at an approved elementary, middle, or secondary school.

Must be approved by a majority of the school board presidents representing school districts having their administrative headquarters in the county.

Serves until the individual resigns or is discharged by the board of county commissioners at the direction of a majority of the school board presidents referenced in subdivision d.

The presidents of the school boards referenced in subsection 1 shall perform the duties of school boards with respect to the evaluation, renewal, and discharge of an individual hired under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 162, § 50; 1999, ch. 196, § 11.

15.1-11-02.
County superintendent of schools — Assignment of duties — Waiver.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a board of county commissioners, by majority vote may choose not to employ a county superintendent of schools, provided the board of county commissioners:

Obtains from the superintendent of public instruction a form that lists all statutory duties to be otherwise performed by a county superintendent and provides for the assignment of all such statutory duties to, and the performance of such statutory duties by, one or more individuals;

Obtains the consent of a majority of the school board presidents representing school districts having their administrative headquarters in the county;

Submits the completed form to the superintendent of public instruction; and

Obtains written approval of the assignments from the superintendent of public instruction.

The superintendent of public instruction may waive the requirements of subsection 1 with respect to any board of county commissioners which, on or before June 30, 1999, assigned to qualified persons the duties of the county superintendent of schools, provided:

The assignment of duties was set forth in a written plan;

The written plan was filed with the legislative council; and

The superintendent of public instruction determines that the written plan substantially complies with the requirements of subsection 1.

The determination of the superintendent regarding the waiver is final.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 11.

15.1-11-03.
County superintendent of schools — Salary.

The county superintendent of schools is entitled to receive a salary, as determined under section 11-10-10.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 11.

15.1-11-04.
County superintendent of schools — Duties.

A county superintendent of schools shall:

Serve as the superintendent of all schools in a county except those schools in districts that employ a district superintendent of schools.

Receive copies of and review, in a timely manner, all reports submitted to the superintendent of public instruction by school districts having their administrative headquarters in the county.

Compile reports containing statistics and any other information requested by the superintendent of public instruction and forward the reports at the time and in the manner directed by the superintendent of public instruction.

If requested by a school district, assist in planning, coordinating, and providing education and related services.

Promote coordination and cooperation among the school districts and the multidistrict special education units within the county.

Assist school districts in taking advantage of incentive programs administered by the superintendent of public instruction.

As secretary of the county committee:

Provide to the public information regarding the annexation of property to another school district;

Provide to the public all forms necessary for the annexation of property to another school district;

Compile information regarding school district annexations and dissolutions and provide such information to the appropriate county committees, at the time and in the manner directed by the state board of public school education; and

Compile information regarding school district annexations, reorganizations, and dissolutions, and provide such information to the state board of public school education, at the time and in the manner directed by the state board.

Perform any other duties required by law.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 11.

15.1-11-05.
Preservation of records.

The county superintendent of schools shall provide for the preservation of all property that is acquired in an official capacity and which has educational value and interest or which records official acts by the county superintendent. At the conclusion of the county superintendent’s employment, the county superintendent shall deliver the property to the superintendent’s successor.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 11.

15.1-11-06.
Clerks — Office and supplies.

The board of county commissioners shall determine the number and salaries of administrative assistants for the county superintendent of schools and shall furnish a suitable office for the county superintendent, together with all necessary equipment, furniture, and supplies. If the board of county commissioners fails to do so, the county superintendent may provide the same and the board of county commissioners shall audit and pay the reasonable expenses so incurred.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 11.